Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE I. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES

CHAPTER 548. HEALTH CARE SERVICES PROVIDED THROUGH TELE-CONNECTIVE MEANS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0001. PROVISION OF SERVICES THROUGH TELECOMMUNICATIONS AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY UNDER MEDICAID AND OTHER PUBLIC BENEFITS PROGRAMS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Behavioral health services" has the meaning assigned by Section 540.0703.

(2) "Case management services" includes service coordination, service management, and care coordination.

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law and to the extent it is cost-effective and clinically effective, as the commission determines, the commission shall ensure that Medicaid recipients, child health plan program enrollees, and other individuals receiving benefits under a public benefits program the commission or a health and human services agency administers, regardless of whether receiving benefits through a managed care delivery model or another delivery model, have the option to receive services as telemedicine medical services, telehealth services, or otherwise using telecommunications or information technology, including the following services:

(1) preventive health and wellness services;

(2) case management services, including targeted case management services;

(3) subject to Subsection (c), behavioral health services;

(4) occupational, physical, and speech therapy services;

(5) nutritional counseling services; and

(6) assessment services, including nursing assessments under the following Section 1915(c) waiver programs:

(A) the community living assistance and support services (CLASS) waiver program;

(B) the deaf-blind with multiple disabilities (DBMD) waiver program;

(C) the home and community-based services (HCS) waiver program; and

(D) the Texas home living (TxHmL) waiver program.

(c) To the extent permitted by state and federal law and to the extent it is cost-effective and clinically effective, as the commission determines, the executive commissioner by rule shall develop and implement a system that ensures behavioral health services may be provided using an audio-only platform consistent with Section 111.008, Occupations Code, to a Medicaid recipient, a child health plan program enrollee, or another individual receiving those services under another public benefits program the commission or a health and human services agency administers.

(d) If the executive commissioner determines that providing services other than behavioral health services is appropriate using an audio-only platform under a public benefits program the commission or a health and human services agency administers, in accordance with applicable federal and state law, the executive commissioner may by rule authorize the provision of those services under the applicable program using the audio-only platform. In determining whether the use of an audio-only platform in a program is appropriate under this subsection, the executive commissioner shall consider whether using the platform would be cost-effective and clinically effective.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0002. RULES AND PROCEDURES REGARDING REIMBURSING CERTAIN TELEMEDICINE MEDICAL SERVICES. (a) In addition to the authority granted by other law regarding telemedicine medical services, the executive commissioner may review rules and procedures applicable to reimbursement of a telemedicine medical service provided through any government-funded health program subject to the commission's oversight. The executive commissioner may modify the rules and procedures as necessary to ensure that reimbursement for a telemedicine medical service is provided:

(1) in a cost-effective manner; and

(2) only in circumstances in which providing the service is clinically effective.

(b) This section does not affect the commission's authority or duties under other law regarding reimbursing a telemedicine medical service under Medicaid.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER B. TELEMEDICINE MEDICAL, TELEDENTISTRY DENTAL, TELEHEALTH, AND HOME TELEMONITORING SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER MEDICAID IN GENERAL

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0051. MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT SYSTEM FOR TELEMEDICINE MEDICAL, TELEDENTISTRY DENTAL, AND TELEHEALTH SERVICES. The executive commissioner by rule shall develop and implement a system to reimburse Medicaid providers for telemedicine medical services, teledentistry dental services, or telehealth services performed.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0052. REIMBURSEMENT FOR TELEMEDICINE MEDICAL, TELEDENTISTRY DENTAL, OR TELEHEALTH SERVICE BY MEDICAID MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION. (a) The commission shall ensure that a Medicaid managed care organization does not:

(1) deny reimbursement for a covered health care service or procedure delivered by a health care provider with whom the organization contracts to a Medicaid recipient as a telemedicine medical service, teledentistry dental service, or telehealth service solely because the covered service or procedure is not provided through an in-person consultation; or

(2) limit, deny, or reduce reimbursement for a covered health care service or procedure delivered by a health care provider with whom the organization contracts to a Medicaid recipient as a telemedicine medical service, teledentistry dental service, or telehealth service based on the provider's choice of platform for providing the health care service or procedure.

(b) In complying with state and federal requirements to provide access to medically necessary services under the Medicaid managed care program, a Medicaid managed care organization determining whether reimbursement for a telemedicine medical service, teledentistry dental service, or telehealth service is appropriate shall continue to consider other factors, including whether:

(1) reimbursement is cost-effective; and

(2) providing the service is clinically effective.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0053. REIMBURSEMENT OF FEDERALLY QUALIFIED HEALTH CENTERS FOR TELEMEDICINE MEDICAL, TELEDENTISTRY DENTAL, OR TELEHEALTH SERVICE. (a) Subject to Subsection (b), the executive commissioner by rule shall ensure that a rural health clinic as defined by 42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)(1) and a federally qualified health center as defined by 42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)(2)(B) may be reimbursed for the originating site facility fee or the distant site practitioner fee or both, as appropriate, for a covered telemedicine medical service, teledentistry dental service, or telehealth service delivered by a health care provider to a Medicaid recipient.

(b) The commission is required to implement this section only if the legislature appropriates money specifically for that purpose. If the legislature does not appropriate money specifically for that purpose, the commission may, but is not required to, implement this section using other money available to the commission for that purpose.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0054. PROVIDER AND FACILITY PARTICIPATION. (a) The commission shall encourage health care providers and health care facilities to provide telemedicine medical services, teledentistry dental services, and telehealth services in the health care delivery system. The commission may not require that a service be provided to a patient through telemedicine medical services, teledentistry dental services, or telehealth services.

(b) The commission shall explore opportunities to increase STAR Health program providers' use of telemedicine medical services in medically underserved areas of this state.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0055. PROMOTION AND SUPPORT OF MEDICAL HOME AND CARE COORDINATION. (a) The commission shall ensure that a Medicaid managed care organization ensures that using telemedicine medical services, teledentistry dental services, or telehealth services promotes and supports patient-centered medical homes by allowing a Medicaid recipient to receive a telemedicine medical service, teledentistry dental service, or telehealth service from a provider other than the recipient's primary care physician or provider, except as provided by Section 548.0202(b), only if:

(1) the service is provided in accordance with the law and contract requirements applicable to providing the same health care service in an in-person setting, including requirements regarding care coordination; and

(2) subject to Subsection (b), the provider of the service gives notice to the Medicaid recipient's primary care physician or provider regarding the service, including a summary of the service, exam findings, a list of prescribed or administered medications, and patient instructions, for the purpose of sharing medical information.

(b) A provider of a telemedicine medical service, teledentistry dental service, or telehealth service is required to provide notice under Subsection (a)(2) only if:

(1) the recipient has a primary care physician or provider; and

(2) the recipient or, if appropriate, the recipient's parent or legal guardian, consents to the notice.

(c) The commission shall develop, document, and implement a monitoring process to ensure that a Medicaid managed care organization ensures that using telemedicine medical services, teledentistry dental services, or telehealth services promotes and supports patient-centered medical homes and care coordination in accordance with Subsection (a). The process must include monitoring of the rate at which a telemedicine medical service, teledentistry dental service, or telehealth service provider gives notice in accordance with Subsection (a)(2).

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0056. BIENNIAL REPORT. Not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the commission shall report to the speaker of the house of representatives and the lieutenant governor on the effects of telemedicine medical services, teledentistry dental services, telehealth services, and home telemonitoring services on Medicaid in this state, including:

(1) the number of physicians, dentists, health professionals, and licensed health care facilities using the services;

(2) the geographic and demographic disposition of the physicians, dentists, and health professionals;

(3) the number of patients receiving the services;

(4) the types of services being provided;

(5) the utilization cost; and

(6) the cost savings to Medicaid from using the services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0057. RULES. Subject to Sections 111.004 and 153.004, Occupations Code, the executive commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this subchapter. In the rules adopted under this subchapter, the executive commissioner shall refer to:

(1) the site where the patient is physically located as the patient site; and

(2) the site where the physician, dentist, or health professional providing the telemedicine medical service, teledentistry dental service, or telehealth service is physically located as the distant site.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER C. PROVISION OF AND REIMBURSEMENT FOR TELEMEDICINE MEDICAL AND TELEHEALTH SERVICES IN GENERAL

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0101. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Health professional" means:

(A) a physician;

(B) an individual who is:

(i) licensed or certified in this state to perform health care services; and

(ii) authorized to assist a physician in providing telemedicine medical services that are delegated and supervised by the physician; or

(C) a licensed or certified health professional acting within the scope of the license or certification who does not perform a telemedicine medical service.

(2) "Physician" means an individual licensed to practice medicine in this state under Subtitle B, Title 3, Occupations Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0102. MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT REQUIREMENTS: TELEMEDICINE MEDICAL SERVICES. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall require each health and human services agency that administers a part of Medicaid to provide Medicaid reimbursement for a telemedicine medical service initiated or provided by a physician.

(b) The commission shall ensure that reimbursement is provided only for a telemedicine medical service a physician initiates or provides.

(c) The commission shall require reimbursement for a telemedicine medical service at the same rate Medicaid reimburses for the same in-person medical service.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0103. PHYSICIAN'S CHOICE OF PLATFORM. The commission may not limit a physician's choice of platform for providing a telemedicine medical service or telehealth service by requiring that the physician use a particular platform to receive Medicaid reimbursement for the service.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0104. CERTAIN TELEMEDICINE MEDICAL SERVICE REIMBURSEMENT DENIALS PROHIBITED. A request for Medicaid reimbursement for a telemedicine medical service may not be denied solely because an in-person medical service between a physician and a patient did not occur.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0105. PROTOCOLS AND GUIDELINES. A health care facility that receives reimbursement under this subchapter for a telemedicine medical service provided by a physician who practices in that facility or a health professional who participates in a telemedicine medical service under this subchapter shall establish quality of care protocols and patient confidentiality guidelines to ensure that the telemedicine medical service meets legal requirements and acceptable patient care standards.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0106. PROVIDER COORDINATION. If a patient receiving a telemedicine medical service has a primary care physician or provider and the patient or, if appropriate, the patient's parent or legal guardian consents to the notification, the commission shall require that the primary care physician or provider be notified of the telemedicine medical service for the purpose of sharing medical information.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0107. COMPLIANCE. The commission in consultation with the Texas Medical Board shall monitor and regulate the use of telemedicine medical services to ensure compliance with this subchapter. In addition to any other method of enforcement, the commission may use a corrective action plan to ensure compliance with this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0108. TEXAS MEDICAL BOARD RULES. The Texas Medical Board, in consultation with the commission, as appropriate, may adopt rules as necessary to:

(1) ensure that appropriate care, including quality of care, is provided to patients who receive telemedicine medical services; and

(2) prevent abuse and fraud through the use of telemedicine medical services, including rules relating to filing claims and records required to be maintained in connection with telemedicine.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0109. EFFECT ON OTHER REQUIREMENTS. This subchapter does not affect any requirement relating to:

(1) a rural health clinic; or

(2) physician delegation to an advanced practice nurse or physician assistant of the authority to carry out or sign prescription drug orders.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER D. PROVISION OF AND REIMBURSEMENT FOR TELEDENTISTRY DENTAL SERVICES IN GENERAL

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0151. MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT REQUIREMENTS. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall require each health and human services agency that administers a part of Medicaid to provide Medicaid reimbursement for teledentistry dental services provided by a dentist licensed to practice dentistry in this state.

(b) The commission shall require reimbursement for a teledentistry dental service at the same rate as the Medicaid program reimburses for the same in-person dental service.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0152. DENTIST'S CHOICE OF PLATFORM. The commission may not limit a dentist's choice of platform for providing a teledentistry dental service by requiring that the dentist use a particular platform to receive reimbursement for the service.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0153. CERTAIN TELEDENTISTRY DENTAL SERVICES REIMBURSEMENT DENIALS PROHIBITED. A request for reimbursement may not be denied solely because an in-person dental service between a dentist and a patient did not occur.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0154. STATE BOARD OF DENTAL EXAMINERS RULES. The State Board of Dental Examiners, in consultation with the commission and the commission's office of inspector general, as appropriate, may adopt rules as necessary to:

(1) ensure that appropriate care, including quality of care, is provided to patients who receive teledentistry dental services; and

(2) prevent abuse and fraud through the use of teledentistry dental services, including rules relating to filing claims and the records required to be maintained in connection with teledentistry dental services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER E. REIMBURSEMENT FOR TELEMEDICINE MEDICAL, TELEDENTISTRY DENTAL, AND TELEHEALTH SERVICES PROVIDED TO CERTAIN CHILDREN

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0201. REIMBURSEMENT FOR TELEMEDICINE MEDICAL, TELEDENTISTRY DENTAL, AND TELEHEALTH SERVICES PROVIDED TO CHILDREN WITH SPECIAL HEALTH CARE NEEDS. (a) In this section, "child with special health care needs" has the meaning assigned by Section 35.0022, Health and Safety Code.

(b) The executive commissioner by rule shall establish policies that permit reimbursement under Medicaid and the child health plan program for services provided through telemedicine medical services, teledentistry dental services, and telehealth services to children with special health care needs.

(c) The policies required under this section must:

(1) be designed to:

(A) prevent unnecessary travel and encourage efficient use of telemedicine medical services, teledentistry dental services, and telehealth services for children with special health care needs in all suitable circumstances; and

(B) ensure in a cost-effective manner the availability to a child with special health care needs of services appropriately performed using telemedicine medical services, teledentistry dental services, and telehealth services that are comparable to the same types of services available to that child without using telemedicine medical services, teledentistry dental services, and telehealth services; and

(2) provide for reimbursement of multiple providers of different services who participate in a single session of telemedicine medical services, teledentistry dental services, telehealth services, or any combination of those services for a child with special health care needs, if the commission determines that reimbursing each provider for the session is cost-effective in comparison to the costs that would be involved in obtaining the services from providers without using telemedicine medical services, teledentistry dental services, and telehealth services, including the costs of transportation and lodging and other direct costs.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0202. MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT FOR TELEMEDICINE MEDICAL SERVICES PROVIDED IN SCHOOL-BASED SETTING. (a) In this section, "physician" means an individual licensed to practice medicine in this state under Subtitle B, Title 3, Occupations Code.

(b) The commission shall ensure that Medicaid reimbursement is provided to a physician for a telemedicine medical service provided by the physician, even if the physician is not the patient's primary care physician or provider, if:

(1) the physician is an authorized Medicaid health care provider;

(2) the patient is a child who receives the service in a primary or secondary school-based setting; and

(3) the parent or legal guardian of the patient provides consent before the service is provided.

(c) In the case of a telemedicine medical service provided to a child in a school-based setting as described by Subsection (b), the notification under Section 548.0106, if any, must include a summary of the service, including exam findings, prescribed or administered medications, and patient instructions.

(d) If a patient receiving a telemedicine medical service in a school-based setting as described by Subsection (b) does not have a primary care physician or provider, the commission shall require that the patient's parent or legal guardian receive:

(1) the notification required under Section 548.0106; and

(2) a list of primary care physicians or providers from which the patient may select the patient's primary care physician or provider.

(e) The commission in consultation with the Texas Medical Board shall monitor and regulate the use of telemedicine medical services to ensure compliance with this section. In addition to any other method of enforcement, the commission may use a corrective action plan to ensure compliance with this section.

(f) The Texas Medical Board, in consultation with the commission, as appropriate, may adopt rules as necessary to:

(1) ensure that appropriate care, including quality of care, is provided to patients who receive telemedicine medical services; and

(2) prevent abuse and fraud through the use of telemedicine medical services, including rules relating to filing of claims and records required to be maintained in connection with telemedicine.

(g) This section does not affect any requirement relating to:

(1) a rural health clinic; or

(2) physician delegation to an advanced practice nurse or physician assistant of the authority to carry out or sign prescription drug orders.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0203. MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT FOR TELEHEALTH SERVICES PROVIDED THROUGH SCHOOL DISTRICT OR CHARTER SCHOOL. (a) In this section, "health professional" means an individual who is:

(1) licensed, registered, certified, or otherwise authorized by this state to practice as a social worker, occupational therapist, or speech-language pathologist;

(2) a licensed professional counselor;

(3) a licensed marriage and family therapist; or

(4) a licensed specialist in school psychology.

(b) The commission shall ensure that Medicaid reimbursement is provided to a school district or open-enrollment charter school for telehealth services provided through the school district or charter school by a health professional, even if the health professional is not the patient's primary care provider, if:

(1) the school district or charter school is an authorized Medicaid health care provider; and

(2) the parent or legal guardian of the patient provides consent before the service is provided.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER F. MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT FOR HOME TELEMONITORING SERVICES

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0251. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Home and community support services agency" means a person licensed under Chapter 142, Health and Safety Code, to provide home health, hospice, or personal assistance services as those terms are defined by Section 142.001, Health and Safety Code.

(2) "Hospital" means a hospital licensed under Chapter 241, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0252. MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT PROGRAM FOR HOME TELEMONITORING SERVICES AUTHORIZED. If the commission determines that establishing a statewide program that permits Medicaid reimbursement for home telemonitoring services would be cost-effective and feasible, the executive commissioner by rule shall establish the program as provided by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0253. REIMBURSEMENT PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS. (a) A program established under this subchapter must:

(1) provide that home telemonitoring services are available only to an individual who:

(A) is diagnosed with one or more of the following conditions:

(i) pregnancy;

(ii) diabetes;

(iii) heart disease;

(iv) cancer;

(v) chronic obstructive pulmonary disease;

(vi) hypertension;

(vii) congestive heart failure;

(viii) mental illness or serious emotional disturbance;

(ix) asthma;

(x) myocardial infarction; or

(xi) stroke; and

(B) exhibits two or more of the following risk factors:

(i) two or more hospitalizations in the prior 12-month period;

(ii) frequent or recurrent emergency room admissions;

(iii) a documented history of poor adherence to ordered medication regimens;

(iv) a documented history of falls in the prior six-month period;

(v) limited or absent informal support systems;

(vi) living alone or being home alone for extended periods; and

(vii) a documented history of care access challenges;

(2) ensure that clinical information gathered by a home and community support services agency or hospital while providing home telemonitoring services is shared with the patient's physician; and

(3) ensure that the program does not duplicate disease management program services provided under Section 32.057, Human Resources Code.

(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (a)(1), a program established under this subchapter must also provide that home telemonitoring services are available to pediatric individuals who:

(1) are diagnosed with end-stage solid organ disease;

(2) have received an organ transplant; or

(3) require mechanical ventilation.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0254. DISCONTINUATION OF REIMBURSEMENT PROGRAM UNDER CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. If, after implementation, the commission determines that the program established under this subchapter is not cost-effective, the commission may discontinue the program and stop providing Medicaid reimbursement for home telemonitoring services, notwithstanding Subchapter B or any other law.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0255. DETERMINATION OF COST SAVINGS FOR MEDICARE PROGRAM. The commission shall determine whether providing home telemonitoring services to individuals who are eligible to receive benefits under both Medicaid and the Medicare program achieves cost savings for the Medicare program.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0256. REIMBURSEMENT FOR OTHER CONDITIONS AND RISK FACTORS. (a) To comply with state and federal requirements to provide access to medically necessary services under the Medicaid managed care program, a Medicaid managed care organization may reimburse providers for home telemonitoring services provided to individuals who have conditions and exhibit risk factors other than those expressly authorized by this subchapter.

(b) In determining whether the Medicaid managed care organization should provide reimbursement for services under this section, the organization shall consider whether reimbursement for the service is cost-effective and providing the service is clinically effective.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER G. MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT FOR INTERNET MEDICAL CONSULTATIONS

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0301. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "physician" means an individual licensed to practice medicine in this state under Subtitle B, Title 3, Occupations Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0302. MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT FOR INTERNET MEDICAL CONSULTATION AUTHORIZED. (a) The executive commissioner by rule may require the commission and each health and human services agency that administers a part of Medicaid to provide Medicaid reimbursement for a medical consultation that a physician or other health care professional provides using the Internet as a cost-effective alternative to an in-person consultation.

(b) The executive commissioner may require the commission or a health and human services agency to provide the reimbursement described by this section only if the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services develops an appropriate Current Procedural Terminology code for medical services provided using the Internet.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0303. PILOT PROGRAM FOR MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT FOR INTERNET MEDICAL CONSULTATION. (a) The executive commissioner may develop and implement a pilot program in one or more sites the executive commissioner chooses under which Medicaid reimbursements are paid for medical consultations provided by physicians or other health care professionals using the Internet. The pilot program must be designed to test whether an Internet medical consultation is a cost-effective alternative to an in-person consultation under Medicaid.

(b) The executive commissioner may modify the pilot program as necessary throughout the program's implementation to maximize the potential cost-effectiveness of Internet medical consultations.

(c) If the executive commissioner determines from the pilot program that Internet medical consultations are cost-effective, the executive commissioner may expand the pilot program to additional sites or implement Medicaid reimbursements for Internet medical consultations statewide.

(d) The executive commissioner is not required to implement the pilot program authorized under Subsection (a) as a prerequisite to providing Medicaid reimbursement authorized by Section 548.0302 on a statewide basis.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER H. PEDIATRIC TELE-CONNECTIVITY RESOURCE PROGRAM FOR RURAL TEXAS

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0351. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Nonurban health care facility" means a hospital licensed under Chapter 241, Health and Safety Code, or other licensed health care facility in this state that is located in a rural area as defined by Section 845.002, Insurance Code.

(2) "Pediatric specialist" means a physician who is certified in general pediatrics by the American Board of Pediatrics or American Osteopathic Board of Pediatrics.

(3) "Pediatric subspecialist" means a physician who is certified in a pediatric subspecialty by a member board of the American Board of Medical Specialties or American Osteopathic Board of Pediatrics.

(4) "Pediatric tele-specialty provider" means a pediatric health care facility in this state that offers continuous access to telemedicine medical services provided by pediatric subspecialists.

(5) "Physician" means an individual licensed to practice medicine in this state.

(6) "Program" means the pediatric tele-connectivity resource program for rural Texas established under this subchapter.

(7) Notwithstanding Section 521.0001, "telemedicine medical service" means a health care service delivered to a patient:

(A) by a physician acting within the scope of the physician's license or a health professional acting under the delegation and supervision of a physician and within the scope of the health professional's license;

(B) from a physical location that is different from the patient's location; and

(C) using telecommunications or information technology.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0352. ESTABLISHMENT OF PEDIATRIC TELE-CONNECTIVITY RESOURCE PROGRAM FOR RURAL TEXAS. The commission with any necessary assistance of pediatric tele-specialty providers shall establish a pediatric tele-connectivity resource program for rural Texas to award grants to nonurban health care facilities to connect the facilities with pediatric specialists and pediatric subspecialists who provide telemedicine medical services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0353. USE OF PROGRAM GRANT. A nonurban health care facility awarded a grant under this subchapter may use grant money to:

(1) purchase equipment necessary for implementing a telemedicine medical service;

(2) modernize the facility's information technology infrastructure and secure information technology support to ensure an uninterrupted two-way video signal that is compliant with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-191);

(3) pay a service fee to a pediatric tele-specialty provider under an annual contract with the provider; or

(4) pay for other activities, services, supplies, facilities, resources, and equipment the commission determines necessary for the facility to use a telemedicine medical service.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0354. SELECTION OF PROGRAM GRANT RECIPIENTS. (a) The commission with any necessary assistance of pediatric tele-specialty providers may select an eligible nonurban health care facility to receive a grant under this subchapter.

(b) To be eligible for a grant, a nonurban health care facility must have:

(1) a quality assurance program that measures the compliance of the facility's health care providers with the facility's medical protocols;

(2) on staff at least one full-time equivalent physician who has training and experience in pediatrics and one individual who is responsible for ongoing nursery and neonatal support and care;

(3) a designated neonatal intensive care unit or an emergency department;

(4) a commitment to obtaining neonatal or pediatric education from a tertiary facility to expand the facility's depth and breadth of telemedicine medical service capabilities; and

(5) the capability of maintaining records and producing reports that measure the effectiveness of the grant the facility would receive.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0355. GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS. (a) The commission may solicit and accept gifts, grants, and donations from any public or private source for the purposes of this subchapter.

(b) A political subdivision that participates in the program may pay part of the costs of the program.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0356. WORK GROUP. (a) The commission may establish a program work group to:

(1) assist the commission with developing, implementing, or evaluating the program; and

(2) prepare a report on the results and outcomes of the grants awarded under this subchapter.

(b) A program work group member is not entitled to compensation for serving on the program work group and may not be reimbursed for travel or other expenses incurred while conducting the business of the program work group.

(c) A program work group is not subject to Chapter 2110.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0357. BIENNIAL REPORT. Not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the commission shall submit a report to the governor and members of the legislature regarding the activities of the program and grant recipients under the program, including the results and outcomes of grants awarded under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0358. RULES. The executive commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0359. APPROPRIATION REQUIRED. The commission may not spend state funds to accomplish the purposes of this subchapter and is not required to award a grant under this subchapter unless money is appropriated for the purposes of this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER I. TELEHEALTH TREATMENT PROGRAM FOR SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 548.0401. TELEHEALTH TREATMENT PROGRAM FOR SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS. The executive commissioner by rule shall establish a program to increase opportunities and expand access to telehealth treatment for substance use disorders in this state.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.